Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 64. Medicine.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to needle stick and sharps injury protections, see AS

18.60.880

—

18.60.890

.

Administrative Code. —

For state medical board, see 12 AAC 40.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 (HB 159), which amended provisions in this chapter relating to opioid prescription and education on pain management and opioid use and addiction, see 2017 House Journal 408 — 410.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers, §§ 1-157.

70 C.J.S., Physicians and Surgeons, § 1 et seq.

Constitutionality and construction of statutes or regulations prohibiting one who has no license to practice dentistry or medicine from owning, maintaining, or operating an office therefor,
20 ALR2d 808.